District of Columbia statutes.
1-328.14

Requirements for administration of grant programs.

A grantor administering a grant program covered by this part shall:

(1)

Within 45 days from the closing date of the grant application process, provide notification to all applicants of the acceptance or rejection of their applications for the grant funds; and

(2)

(A)

Maintain records of any written communications as well as a description of any other communications, including telephonic or face-to-face communications, between the grantor and any District government official or staff regarding:

(i)

The development of the selection criteria or eligibility requirements;

(ii)

Selection by the grantor of a grantee; or

(iii)

Issues with a grantee’s compliance with grant-program requirements.

(B)

Records required under this paragraph shall be provided, upon request, within a reasonable time, to the Mayor, or his or her designee, or to a member of the Council.

History

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 1095, 60 DCR 12472
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1053(d), 62 DCR 10905

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-328.13.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “45 days” for “30 days” in (1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1095 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1095 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1053(d) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Short Title

Section 1091 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title I of the act may be cited as the “Grant Administration Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.